Utah statutes.
13-42-106.    Application for registration -- Required information.
An application for registration must be signed under penalty of perjury and
include:
(1)  the applicant's name, principal business address and telephone number,
and all other business addresses in this state, electronic-mail addresses, and
Internet website addresses;
(2)  all names under which the applicant conducts business;
(3)  the address of each location in this state at which the applicant will
provide debt-management services or a statement that the applicant will have
no such location;
(4)  the name and home address of each officer and director of the applicant
and each person that owns at least 10% of the applicant;
(5)  identification of every jurisdiction in which, during the five years
immediately preceding the application:
(a)  the applicant or any of its officers or directors has been licensed or
registered to provide debt-management services; or
(b)  individuals have resided when they received debt-management services from
the applicant;
(6)  a statement describing, to the extent it is known or should be known by
the applicant, any material civil or criminal judgment or litigation and any
material administrative or enforcement action by a governmental agency in any
jurisdiction against the applicant, any of its officers, directors, owners, or
agents, or any person who is authorized to have access to the trust account
required by Section 13-42-122;
(7)  the applicant's financial statements, audited by an accountant licensed
to conduct audits, for each of the two years immediately preceding the
application or, if it has not been in operation for the two years preceding
the application, for the period of its existence;
(8)  evidence of accreditation by an independent accrediting organization
approved by the administrator;
(9)  evidence that, within 12 months after initial employment, each of the
applicant's counselors becomes certified as a certified counselor;
(10)  a description of the three most commonly used educational programs that
the applicant provides or intends to provide to individuals who reside in this
state and a copy of any materials used or to be used in those programs;
(11)  a description of the applicant's financial analysis and initial budget
plan, including any form or electronic model, used to evaluate the financial
condition of individuals;
(12)  a copy of each form of agreement that the applicant will use with
individuals who reside in this state;
(13)  the schedule of fees and charges that the applicant will use with
individuals who reside in this state;
(14)  at the applicant's expense, the results of a criminal records check,
including fingerprints, conducted within the immediately preceding 12 months,
covering every officer of the applicant and every employee or agent of the
applicant who is authorized to have access to the trust account required by
Section 13-42-122;
(15)  the names and addresses of all employers of each director during the ten
years immediately preceding the application;
(16)  a description of any ownership interest of at least 10% by a director,
owner, or employee of the applicant in:
(a)  any affiliate of the applicant; or
(b)  any entity that provides products or services to the applicant or any
individual relating to the applicant's debt-management services;
(17)  a statement of the amount of compensation of the applicant's five most
highly compensated employees for each of the three years immediately preceding
the application or, if it has not been in operation for the three years
preceding the application, for the period of its existence;
(18)  the identity of each director who is an affiliate, as defined in
Subsection 13-42-102(2)(a) or (2)(b)(i), (ii), (iv), (v), (vi), or (vii), of
the applicant; and
(19)  any other information that the administrator reasonably requires to
perform the administrator's duties under Section 13-42-109.
